src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON SÁGE !!= @CODE@  gen: sáhkaha.  Presently only for "ságe". Long and short essive.
    +Sg+Nom:e%>Q1 K-VOW                 ;
           :ah%>  OTH-ODDCASE       ;
           :ah»   DenominalNounsODD ;
           :ah»   DenominalAdjsODD  ;
           :ah%>  ODDCmp            ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:e%>Q1 R                 ;
           :ah%>  AHTÁ              ;

!!€gt-norm: ságe # Odd-syllable test
!!€ ságe:            ságe+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ sáhkahav:          ságe+N+Sg+Acc

LEXICON BAVSEV !!= @CODE@  Ends on -v and last vowel changes to i: bavsev:baksIma. Not like gierkav gierkkAma and birev birEma.
    +Sg+Nom:e%>Q1v K-CONS                ;
       +Ess:e%>Q1n K-CONS                ;
           :im%>   OTH-ODDCASE       ;
           :im»    DenominalNounsODD ;
           :im»    DenominalAdjsODD  ;
           :im%>   ODDCmp            ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:e%>Q1v R                 ;
           :im%>   AHTÁ              ;


!!€gt-norm: sievtev # Odd-syllable test
!!€ sievtev:            sievtev+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ siektimis:          sievtev+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON RÁBEV !!= @CODE@ rábev:ráhpuga. Presently only for "rábev".
    +Sg+Nom:bev%>  K-CONS                ;
       +Ess:ben%>  K-CONS                ;
           :hpug%> OTH-ODDCASE       ;
           :hpug»  DenominalNounsODD ;
           :hpug»  DenominalAdjsODD  ;
           :hpug%> ODDCmp            ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:bev%>  R                 ;
           :hpug»  AHTÁ              ;

!!€gt-norm: rábev # Odd-syllable test
!!€ rábev:            rábev+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ ráhpugis:          rábev+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON RITJAS !!!= @CODE@  Like GÁMAS but without stem a-lengthening for grade I (underlying long -i-). presently only for "ritjas".
    +Sg+Nom:tjas%>    K-CONS                ;
       +Ess:tjan%>    K-CONS                ;
           :htjas%>   OTH-ODDCASE       ;
           :htjas»X5  DenominalNounsODD ;
           :htjas»    DenominalAdjsODD  ;
           :htjas%>X5 ODDCmp            ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:tjas%>    R                 ;
           :htjas»    AHTÁ              ;

!!€gt-norm: ritjas # Odd-syllable test
!!€ ritjas:            ritjas+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ rihtjasis:          ritjas+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON SÅGAS !!= @CODE@  gen: sågaska. Presently only for "sågas".
    +Sg+Nom:%>  K-CONS                ;
           :k%> OTH-ODDCASE       ;
           :k»  DenominalNounsODD ;
           :k»  DenominalAdjsODD  ;
           :k%> ODDCmp            ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>  R                 ;
           :k»  AHTÁ              ;
!!€gt-norm: sågas # Odd-syllable test
!!€ sågas:            sågas+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ sågaskav:          sågas+N+Sg+Acc

LEXICON SJUVÁJ !!= @CODE@  Presently only for "sjuváj". sjuváj-sjuvvaga. Only this word
    +Sg+Nom:áj%>  K-CONS                ;
       +Ess:án%>  K-CONS                ;
           :vag%> OTH-ODDCASE       ;
           :vag»  DenominalNounsODD ;
           :vag»  DenominalAdjsODD  ;
           :vag%> ODDCmp            ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:váj%> R                 ;
           :vag»  AHTÁ              ;

!!€gt-norm: sjuváj # Odd-syllable test
!!€ sjuváj:            sjuváj+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ sjuvvagis:          sjuváj+N+Sg+Ela

LEXICON BØSOJ !!= @CODE@ Because of bösoj in O.Korhonen, and bæsoj-bessuga. Only for these two words. J becomes g.
    +Sg+Nom:%>Q1j K-CONS                ;
       +Ess:%>Q1n K-CONS                ;
           :g%>X5 OTH-ODDCASE       ;
           :g»X5  DenominalNounsODD ;
           :g»X5  DenominalAdjsODD  ;
           :g%>X5 ODDCmp            ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>Q1j R                 ;
           :g»X5  AHTÁ              ;

LEXICON GUOVSOJVUOJOJ !!= @CODE@ vuojoj:vuodjom. Presently only for "guovsojvuojoj".
    +Sg+Nom:%>Q1j  K-CONS                ;
       +Ess:%>Q1n  K-CONS                ;
           :%>m    OTH-ODDCASE       ;
           :%>X5m» DenominalNounsODD ;
           :m»     DenominalAdjsODD  ;
           :%>X5m  ODDCmp            ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:%>Q1j  R                 ;
           :m»     AHTÁ              ;

!!€gt-norm: guovsojvuojoj # Odd-syllable test
!!€ guovsojvuojoj:            guovsojvuojoj+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ guovsojvuodjomav:          guovsojvuojoj+N+Sg+Acc

LEXICON BUTJES !!= @CODE@  butjes-buttjása. Presently only for "butjes". This is an sub. Korhonen has this form but if you look in Grundstöm it's buttjes-budtjasa. Must be a typo in Korhonen, because ttj-tj dosn't exist in smj. This form is err subed in stems file.
    +Sg+Nom:jes%>    K-CONS                ;
       +Ess:jen%>    K-CONS                ; ! X1 to delete cns before short ess
           :tjes%>X5 OTH-ODDCASE       ; ! X5 is e:å and o:u
           :tjes»X5  DenominalNounsODD ;
           :tjes»X5  DenominalAdjsODD  ;
           :tjes%>X5 ODDCmp            ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:jes%>    R                 ;
           :tjes%>X5 AHTÁ              ;


LEXICON TJÅLKES !!= @CODE@ tjålkes:tjoalkkas- Presently only for "tjålkes and tsålkes". This must be wrong, and it dosn't exist in Grundström. Å in 1. syll isn't possible with e in 2. syll. Must be tjoalkes-tjoalkkása or tjålkas-tjoalkkasa. This form is err subed in stems file.
    +Sg+Nom:ålkes%>     K-CONS                ;
       +Ess:ålken%>     K-CONS                ;
           :oalkkas%>   OTH-ODDCASE       ;
           :oalkkas»X5  DenominalNounsODD ;
           :oalkkas»    DenominalAdjsODD  ;
           :oalkkas%>X5 ODDCmp            ;
 +Cmp/SgNom:ålkes%>     R                 ;
           :oalkkas%>   AHTÁ              ;

!!€gt-norm: tsålkes # Odd-syllable test
!!$ tsålkes:            tsålkes+N+Sg+Nom
!!$ tsoalkkasav:          tsålkes+N+Sg+Acc

LEXICON VÁJES  !!= @CODE@ vájes:vádjas- Presently only for "báhkovájes". It's a sub: 2. syll e doesn't become a. Must be vájes-vádjása or vájas-vádjasa. The second is used in NT, so I belive thats the right one. This form is err subed in stems file.
     +Sg+Nom:ájes%>    K-CONS                ;
        +Ess:ájen%>    K-CONS                ;
        +Ess:ádjasin%> K-CONS                ;
            :ádjas%>   OTH-ODDCASE       ;
            :ádjas»X5  DenominalNounsODD ;
            :ádjas»    DenominalAdjsODD  ;
            :ádjas%>X5 ODDCmp            ;
  +Cmp/SgNom:ájes%>    R                 ;
            :ádjas»    AHTÁ              ;



!LEXICON GÅRDAL !!= @CODE@ gårdal:goardala. Presently only for "gårdal". Not needed anymore since the å-oa changed is fixed, is works in GÁMAS
!           :%>X3      NE-ODDCASE        ;
!           :%>X5      OTH-ODDCASE       ;
!           :»X5       DenominalNounsODD ;
!           :»X5       DenominalAdjsODD  ;
!           :%>X5      ODDCmp            ;
! +Cmp/SgNom:%>X3      R                 ;
!           :%>X5      AHTÁ              ;



!LEXICON SEKKAS !!= @CODE@ sekkas:seggasa. Only for "sekkas-sæggasa", made to get te e>æ change. Not needed anymore since the e-æ changed is fixed, it works in GÁMAS
!    +Sg+Nom:kkas%>    K                 ;
!       +Ess:kkan%>    K                 ;
!           :ggás%>    OTH-ODDCASE       ;
!           :ggás»     DenominalNounsODD ;
!           :ggás»     DenominalAdjsODD  ;
!           :ggás%>    ODDCmp            ;
! +Cmp/SgNom:kkas%>    R                 ;
!           :ggás»     AHTÁ              ;

!! Derived stems
! _________
