src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPx
bavsev+N+Sem/Body:baks BAVSEV ;
buttjes+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Substnc:but BUTJES ; ! The tj-ttj changed dosn't exist in smj
báhkovájas+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Cat_Txt:báhko#v VÁJES ; ! 2syll e can't become a
bátsev+v1+N+Sem/State:báhts BAVSEV ;
bæsoj+N+Sem/Plantpart:bæsso BØSOJ ; ! Strange with j-g,
guovsojvuojoj+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Wthr:guovsoj#vuodjo GUOVSOJVUOJOJ ;
gárev+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:gárr BAVSEV ;
ritjas+N+Sem/Prod-audio:ri RITJAS ;
rábev+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:rá RÁBEV ;
sievtev+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:siekt BAVSEV ;
sjuváj+N+Sem/Dummytag:sjuv SJUVÁJ ;
sádev+N+Sem/Dummytag:sád BAVSEV ;
ságe+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:sáhk SÁGE ;
sågas+N+Sem/Dummytag:sågas SÅGAS ;
tjålkas+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:tj TJÅLKES ; ! Lexicon is a sub/Err/Orth
tsålkas+N+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:ts TJÅLKES ; ! Lexicon is a sub/Err/Orth
garev+N+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:garr BAVSEV ; !innrigning, av feks bjørn, Grundstrøm s 182
